Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-108] Legislative and advisory
committees. (a) A legislative committee comprising state legislators or
their designees shall be established to monitor the operations of, and make
recommendations to, the commission including the management committee; provided
that the manner of selection and term of any legislative committee member shall
be as set forth in the bylaws. Prior to the adoption by the commission of any
uniform standard, revision to the bylaws, annual budget, or other significant
matter as may be provided in the bylaws, the management committee shall consult
with and report to the legislative committee.

(b) The commission shall establish two
advisory committees, one of which shall be comprised of consumer
representatives independent of the insurance industry, and the other, of
insurance industry representatives.

(c) The commission may establish additional
advisory committees as its bylaws may provide for the carrying out of its
functions. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next